Washington statutes.
RCW 15.21.020

Unlawful practices.

It shall be unlawful to cause a limitation to be placed on the amount of fresh fruit that a purchaser may buy at retail or wholesale when such fresh fruit is offered for sale, through any media, below cost to the seller. The foregoing shall apply to all such fresh fruit offered for sale below cost and owned, possessed or controlled by such seller.

[ 1965 c 61 s 2.]